src/fst/affixes/particles.lexc
!! !!!Particles
!! ----
!! Komi Particles


LEXICON PCLE_
: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PCLE_NEG
+Aux+Neg: PredMonLex ;

LEXICON PcleIntens
+Intens: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ONOM_
+Ideoph: WordEnd ;

!LEXICON DESCR-End
! DescrTag ;
LEXICON DESCR_
+Ideoph: WordEnd ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
